Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-3212
Licensee; agents and employees; compliance required.

It shall be the duty of every licensee and, so far as applicable, of every officer, agent, and employee of every licensee to comply with the provisions of sections 71-3201 to 71-3213 and with every applicable rule and regulation made and adopted by the secretary.

Laws 1959, c. 329, § 12, p. 1200.